trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.is.dix
    <pardef n="öflug/ur__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="vei"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="sta"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>

    <e lm="stöðugur"><i>stöðug</i><par n="öflug/ur__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="öflugur"><i>öflug</i><par n="öflug/ur__adj"/></e>
